Arkansas, session 2025, SB247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas Absentee
Voter Integrity Act of 2025".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-5-416 is amended to read as follows:
7-5-416. Counting of absentee ballots —— Definition.
(a)(1) The election officials for absentee ballots shall meet in a
place designated by the county board of election commissioners no earlier
than the Tuesday before the election for the purpose of opening the outer
envelope, processing, and canvassing of absentee ballot paper work of the
*SSS155*
02/18/2025 8:09:36 AM SSS155

SB247
outer envelope and no earlier than 8:30 a.m. on election day for the purpose
of opening the inner absentee ballot envelope and counting the absentee
ballots.
(2) The absentee ballots shall be tabulated or counted no
earlier than 8:30 a.m. on election day.
(3) The county board of election commissioners shall:
(A) Give public notice of the time and location of the
opening, processing, canvassing, and counting of absentee ballots and early
voting ballots as provided in § 7-5-202; and
(B) Allow public access for the in-person viewing of the
absentee canvassing process.
(3)(4) The county clerk shall provide the county board of
election commissioners with a daily count of absentee applications received,
to be reported weekly or upon request of the county board of election
commissioners.
(4)(5) The county clerk shall provide the county board of
election commissioners with a daily count of absentee ballots received, to be
reported weekly or upon request of the county board of election
commissioners.
(5)(6) The county clerk shall forward the following items to the
election officials designated by the county board of election commissioners
to open, process, canvass, and count absentee ballots:
(A) The absentee ballot applications sorted alphabetically
and by precinct;
(B) The absentee ballots; and
(C) A written report containing the following information:
(i) The number of absentee ballot applications
received by the county clerk;
(ii) The number of absentee ballots sent by the
county clerk;
(iii) The number of absentee ballots returned to the
county clerk;
(iv) The number of absentee ballots rejected by the
county clerk and the reason for the rejection;
(v) The number of absentee ballots marked as
received on the paper absentee ballot applications list; and
02/18/2025 8:09:36 AM SSS155

SB247
(vi) If the number of absentee ballots returned to
the county clerk and the number of absentee ballots marked as received on the
paper absentee ballot lists are different and the reason for the difference
is known, the reason for the difference.
(6)(7) The processing and counting of absentee ballots shall be
open to the public, and candidates and authorized poll watchers may be
present in person or by a representative designated in writing under § 7-5-
312 during the opening, processing, canvassing, and counting of the absentee
ballots as provided in this subchapter.
(7)(A)(8)(A) The county board of election commissioners shall
begin tabulating absentee ballots and early votes before the polls close on
election day and continue counting absentee votes until all absentee votes,
except for overseas voters as otherwise provided under this section, and
early votes are counted and completed before counting or tabulating election
day votes Absentee and early votes shall be counted prior to the closing of
the polls on election day as provided under this section.
(B)(i) The county board of election commissioners shall
report by precinct the initial count of early votes and absentee ballot votes
to the Secretary of State as provided under § 7-5-701 as soon as practical
after the polls close on election day.
(ii) No election results of the precinct shall be
printed, posted, or released until after the polls close on election day.
(8)(A)(9)(A) After the outer envelope of an absentee ballot is
opened, a county clerk and deputies of the county clerk shall not have access
to:
(i) The absentee ballots;
(ii) Absentee ballot paperwork; or
(iii) The inner envelope of an absentee ballot.
(B) The county board of election commissioners may grant a
county clerk or deputies of the county clerk access to the absentee ballot
materials in subdivision (a)(8)(A) (a)(9)(A) of this section if the access is
granted by an affirmative vote of the county board of election commissioners
for a specific purpose and for a designated election.
(b)(1) The opening, processing, counting, and canvassing of absentee
ballots absentee ballot materials shall be conducted opened by two (2)
election officials as follows:
02/18/2025 8:09:36 AM SSS155

SB247
(A) One (1) of the election officials shall open outer
absentee ballot envelopes one by one and verify the contents locate the
required voter materials;
(B) If the required materials are properly placed in the
outer absentee ballot envelope, the election official shall proceed to read
aloud from the voter statement the name of the voter; The election officials
shall:
(i) Read aloud from the voter statement the name of
the voter and the voting precinct in which the voter claims to be a legal
voter;
(ii) List the name and voting precinct of the voter;
(iii) Compare the voter materials as provided under
subdivision (b)(2) of this section; and
(iv) For first-time voters who registered by mail,
compare the first-time voter's identification document unless the voter
previously provided identification at the time of mailing the voter
registration application;
(C) If the required materials are not properly placed in
the outer absentee ballot envelope, a:
(i) A second election official shall open the inner
absentee ballot envelope to verify the contents locate the required voter
materials no earlier than 8:30 a.m. on election day; and
(D)(ii) If all required materials are present within one
(1) or the other envelope, the The election officials shall put place the
absentee ballot materials, while preserving the secrecy of the voter's ballot
within the inner absentee envelope, in the proper an envelope while
preserving the secrecy of the voter's ballot and shall proceed to read aloud
from the voter statement the name of the voter and the voting precinct in
which the voter claims to be a legal voter; marked "provisional", and the
absentee ballot shall be considered a provisional ballot; and
(E) As each outer envelope is opened and the name of the
voter is read, the election officials for the absentee box shall list the
name and voting precinct of the voter;
(D) If the required materials are properly placed in the
outer absentee envelope, then the election officials shall compare the voter
materials as provided under subdivision (b)(2) of this section.
02/18/2025 8:09:36 AM SSS155

SB247
(2)(A) After the opening of the absentee ballot materials, the
two (2) election officials shall canvass and compare the absentee ballot
materials as follows:
(i) The election officials shall compare all
absentee ballot materials returned, except the voter's ballot, which shall be
maintained within the inner absentee ballot envelope to preserve the secrecy
of the ballot, including without limitation:
(a) Absentee ballot applications;
(b) Voter statements;
(c) A voter's voter identity documentation;
and
(d) Any additional information or
documentation provided by the voter in the absentee ballot envelope;
(ii) The election officials shall review the
absentee ballot materials to determine whether:
(a) The voter's name, residential voting
address, date of birth, and signature are comparable;
(b) The voter identification document, voter
statement, and inner envelope containing the absentee ballot are present; and
(c) If a designated bearer, authorized agent,
or administrator delivers the ballot, the name of the designated bearer,
authorized agent, or administrator written on the absentee ballot application
compares with the information on the voter statement;
(F)(i) After the election official reads aloud from the
statement, the election officials shall compare the name, address, date of
birth, and signature of the voter's absentee application with the voter's
statement and, for first-time voters who registered by mail, the first-time
voter's identification document unless the voter previously provided
identification at the time of mailing the voter registration application.
(ii) If the county board of election commissioners
determines that the absentee application and the voter's statement do not
compare as to name, residential voting address, date of birth, and signature,
the absentee ballot shall not be counted.
(iii) The election officials shall place the
absentee ballot materials, including the inner envelope containing the
ballot, in an envelope marked "provisional", and the absentee ballot shall be
02/18/2025 8:09:36 AM SSS155

SB247
considered a provisional ballot if:
(a) The absentee application and the voter's
statement do not compare as to name, residential voting address, date of
birth, or signature; or
(b) A designated bearer, authorized agent, or
administrator delivers the ballot, and the name of the designated bearer,
authorized agent, or administrator does not compare with the information on
the voter statement;
(iv) If a first-time voter fails to provide the
required voter identification with the absentee ballot or at the time of
mailing the voter registration application, then the absentee application,
absentee ballot envelope, and voter's statement shall be placed in an
envelope marked “provisional” and the absentee ballot shall be considered a
provisional ballot; or if any other voter fails to provide the required voter
identification with the absentee ballot, the election officials shall place
the absentee ballot materials including the inner envelope containing the
ballot in an envelope marked "provisional", and the absentee ballot shall be
considered a provisional ballot;
(v) The ballot shall be designated to be counted or
tabulated if:
(a) All required absentee ballot materials are
present;
(b) The voter’s name, residential voting
address, date of birth, and signature compare; and
(c) If a designated bearer, authorized agent,
or administrator delivered the ballot, the name of the designated bearer,
authorized agent, or administrator written on the absentee ballot application
compares with the information on the voter statement; and
(vi) The absentee ballot materials shall be
transmitted to the county board of election commissioners for additional
review if:
(a) Any required absentee ballot materials are
missing;
(b) The voter's name, residential voting
address, date of birth, and signature do not compare; or
(c) If a designated bearer, authorized agent,
02/18/2025 8:09:36 AM SSS155

SB247
or administrator delivers the ballot, the name of the designated bearer,
authorized agent, or administrator does not compare with the information on
the voter statement.
(B)(i) A member of a county board of election
commissioners, acting in his or her individual capacity as an election
official, may perform the duties under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section.
(ii) However, performance of the duties under
subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section by a member of the county board of
election commissioners shall not satisfy or serve as performance of the
duties of the whole county board of election commissioners under subdivision
(b)(3) of this section.
(3) After canvassing and comparison by the election officials,
the absentee ballot materials shall be canvassed and compared by the county
board of election commissioners as follows:
(A)(i) The county board of election commissioners shall
review the absentee ballot materials transmitted to it under subdivision
(b)(2)(A)(vi) of this section.
(ii) The county board of election commissioners may:
(a) Review the absentee ballot materials that
were designated to be counted or tabulated by the election officials before
counting or tabulation; and
(b) Accept the designation of the election
officials that the ballot is to be counted or reverse the designation of the
election officials and mark the ballot as provisional;
(B)(i) A ballot shall be counted or tabulated if the:
(a) Required absentee ballot materials are
present;
(b) Voter's name, residential voting address,
date of birth, and signatures compare; and
(c) If a designated bearer, authorized agent,
or administrator delivered the ballot, the name of the designated bearer,
authorized agent, or administrator written on the absentee ballot application
compares with the information on the voter statement.
(ii) The absentee ballot materials and the absentee
ballot shall be placed in an envelope marked “provisional” and the absentee
ballot shall be considered a provisional ballot if:
02/18/2025 8:09:36 AM SSS155

SB247
(a) The required absentee ballot materials are
incomplete or missing;
(b) The voter’s name, residential voting
address, date of birth, and signature do not compare; or
(c) If a designated bearer, authorized agent,
or administrator delivers the ballot, the name of the designated bearer,
authorized agent, or administrator does not compare with the information on
the voter statement;
(G)(i) The election officials shall compare the name and
address of the bearer, agent, or administrator written on the absentee ballot
return envelope with the information on the voter statement. If the
information does not match, then the outer envelope, absentee application,
secrecy envelope containing the ballot, and the voter's statement shall be
placed in an envelope marked “provisional” and the absentee ballot shall be
considered a provisional ballot.
(ii) The election officials shall compare the name
of the bearer written on the absentee ballot application with the information
on the voter statement, and if the information does not compare, the ballot
shall be a provisional ballot.
(iii) An absentee ballot designated as a provisional
ballot for the lack of a designation of, or name of, a designated bearer
shall be counted only if the county board of election commissioners does not
determine that the provisional ballot is invalid and should not be counted
based on other grounds;
(H) If the absentee voter fails to return the voter
statement, the vote shall not be counted;
(I)(C) Failure of the voter to submit the required
absentee materials in the proper envelopes shall not be grounds for
disqualifying the voter; and
(D)(i) An absentee ballot that has been designated
provisional shall be cured according to the procedure set out in Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13(b)(5)(A) and (B) if, upon a public vote, the
county board of election commissioners determines that the absentee ballot:
(a) Does not include the required voter
identification with the absentee ballot materials;
(b) Does not include the voter statement with
02/18/2025 8:09:36 AM SSS155

SB247
the absentee ballot materials;
(c) Has a signature that does not compare; or
(d) Has an address on the voter statement that
is materially and substantially different from either the voting residence
address of the voter or the address at which the voter requested to receive
the absentee ballot by mail as set forth on the absentee ballot application.
(ii) An absentee ballot that has otherwise been
designated provisional under this section may be cured by the voter:
(a) By 12:00 noon the Monday following the
election;
(b) In person or in writing to the county
clerk, county board of election commissioners, or appropriately designated
staff or election officials; and
(c) By:
(1) Providing or correcting the absentee
ballot materials or verification if the reason for designation as a
provisional ballot was an incomplete submission;
(2) Verifying in writing under penalty
of perjury that he or she voted the ballot received by the county clerk if
the reason for designation as a provisional ballot was that:
(A) The voter's name, residential
voting address, except as set out under subdivision (b)(3)(D)(i)(d) of this
section, date of birth, or signature did not compare; or
(B) If a designated bearer,
authorized agent, or administrator delivered the ballot, and the name of the
designated bearer, authorized agent, or administrator did not compare with
the information on the voter statement; or
(3) Reviewing the ballot located inside
the inner envelope marked as provisional in a private and independent manner
to verify that the ballot marked as provisional is the ballot submitted by
the voter.
(iii) An absentee ballot shall not be counted if the
absentee ballot has been marked provisional and is not cured under either
subdivision (b)(3)(D)(i) or subdivision (b)(3)(D)(ii) of this section.
(iv) An absentee ballot designated as a provisional
ballot for the lack of a designation of, or name of, a designated bearer,
02/18/2025 8:09:36 AM SSS155

SB247
authorized agent, or administrator shall be counted only if the county board
of election commissioners does not determine that the provisional ballot is
invalid and should not be counted based on other grounds.
(J) If the voter statement does not authorize a bearer,
agent, or administrator to receive or return his or her absentee ballot and
the ballot was received or returned by a bearer, agent, or administrator, the
vote shall not be counted;
(4) Absentee ballot information is comparable or compares if,
after a review of the information available to the election official or
county board of election commissioners, the election official or county board
of election commissioners determines that the absentee ballot that was
submitted was voted by the person in whose name the absentee ballot was
submitted after review of that person's address or other information that was
submitted with the absentee ballot, absentee ballot application, voter
statement, voter identification, or other documentation possessed by, on file
with, or available to the county clerk or the county board of election
commissioners.
(5)(A)(i) After an absentee ballot is designated by an election
official or by the county board of election commissioners as provisional, the
county board of election commissioners shall notify the voter of the deadline
and process for curing his or her absentee ballot as soon as possible but no
later than forty-eight (48) hours after the absentee ballot is designated as
a provisional ballot.
(ii) The county board of election commissioners
shall notify the voter of the deadline and process for curing his or her
absentee ballot by email, telephone, and text message as soon as possible but
no later than forty-eight (48) hours after the absentee ballot is designated
as a provisional ballot if the voter's email address or telephone number is
available.
(iii) If a voter has not provided an email address
or telephone number, the county board of election commissioners shall notify
the voter of the deadline and process for curing his or her absentee ballot
by mail as soon as possible but no later than forty-eight (48) hours after
the absentee ballot is designated as a provisional ballot.
(B) As used in this section, "cure" a ballot means to
remove or repair the issue causing a ballot not to be counted through the
02/18/2025 8:09:36 AM SSS155

SB247
process set forth in this section, such that the ballot shall then be
counted.
(C)(i) If an absentee ballot that was previously
designated as needing additional review under subdivision (b)(2)(A)(vi) of
this section is reviewed by the county board of election commissioners and
approved to be counted or tabulated without being designated as provisional,
the county board of election commissioners shall, by email, telephone, and
text message, if the voter's email address or telephone number is available,
notify the voter as soon as possible but no later than forty-eight (48) hours
after the absentee ballot is approved that he or she no longer needs to cure
his or her ballot.
(ii) If a voter has not provided an email address or
telephone number, the county board of election commissioners shall notify the
voter by mail as soon as possible but no later than forty-eight (48) hours
after the absentee ballot is approved that he or she no longer needs to cure
his or her ballot.
(6)(A) After all of the outer envelopes have been opened, the
election officials of the absentee box shall preserve all the statements of
voters, the voters' identification documents, and all other materials
submitted with the absentee ballot except the ballot itself and deliver them
to the county clerk, who shall file and keep them for the same length of time
after the election as is required for the retention of other ballots.
(B) The voter statements shall be made available for
public inspection and copying during regular business hours no earlier than
8:30 a.m. on the day following the actual delivery of the statement of the
number of outstanding ballots and provisional ballots to the Secretary of
State, and declaration of preliminary and unofficial results of the election
under § 7-5-701(a)(3)(C).
(C) The voters' identification documents shall not be
subject to public inspection except as part of a recount or judicial
proceeding to contest the election.
(7) The absentee ballots that have been designated to be counted
or tabulated shall be opened and processed for counting or tabulation as
follows:
(K)(A) If no challenge is made by a qualified poll watcher,
the election official shall remove the inner envelope, from the absentee
02/18/2025 8:09:36 AM SSS155

SB247
ballot materials without opening the inner envelope containing the ballot,
and place it in the ballot a box designated for ballots to be counted or
tabulated without marking it in any way;
(B) When all of the inner envelopes containing the ballots
have been placed in the ballot box, the ballot box shall be shaken thoroughly
to mix the ballots in such a way to ensure that the inner envelopes
containing the ballots shall be randomized; and
(C) The ballot box shall be opened and the ballots shall
be removed from the inner envelopes, canvassed, and counted.
(8) After the counting and tabulation, the county board of
election commissioners shall preserve all absentee ballots and absentee
ballot materials and shall retain them as election materials for the same
length of time after the election as is required for retention of other
ballots.
(9)(A) If after review of the absentee ballot materials an
election official or the county board of election commissioners suspects that
an absentee ballot was fraudulently submitted, the county board of election
commissioners shall:
(i) File complaints concerning the ballot with the
State Board of Election Commissioners and the county prosecuting attorney no
later than thirty (30) days after certification of the election;
(ii) Provide copies of the relevant absentee ballot
materials, and the county clerk shall provide any relevant absentee ballot
materials in their possession;
(iii) Fully assist all appropriate law enforcement
agencies in the investigation; and
(iv) Notify all candidates of any affected race.
(B) A ballot is not automatically considered fraudulently
submitted merely because it was not counted because:
(i) Not all the required voter materials were
included;
(ii) The voter materials did not compare; or
(iii) A designated bearer, authorized agent, or
administrator delivered the ballot, and the name of the designated bearer,
authorized agent, or administrator did not compare with the information on
the voter statement;
02/18/2025 8:09:36 AM SSS155

SB247
(C) A ballot is not automatically considered fraudulently
submitted if the voter’s actions did not indicate or evince an intention to
violate the election laws of Arkansas or those of the United States
Government.
(D) A ballot is fraudulently submitted if a voter
knowingly violates voting laws, including without limitation by submitting:
(i) More than one (1) ballot;
(ii) A ballot under a false identity; or
(iii) A ballot on behalf of another person without
that person's lawful authorization.
(L)(i) After all of the outer envelopes have been opened,
the election officials of the absentee box shall preserve all the statements
of voters and the voters' identification documents and deliver them to the
county clerk, who shall file and keep them for the same length of time after
the election as is required for retention of other ballots.
(ii) The voter statements shall be made available
for public inspection and copying during regular business hours no earlier
than 8:30 a.m. on the day following the actual delivery of the statement of
the number of outstanding ballots and provisional ballots to the Secretary of
State, and declaration of preliminary and unofficial results of the election
under § 7-5-701(a)(3)(C).
(iii) The voters' identification documents shall not
be subject to public inspection except as part of a judicial proceeding to
contest the election;
(M) When all of the inner envelopes containing the ballots
have been placed in the ballot box, the ballot box shall be shaken thoroughly
to mix the ballots; and
(N) The ballot box shall be opened and the ballots
canvassed and counted.
(2)(10) No election results shall be printed or released prior
to the closing of the polls on election day.
(c) If any person casting an absentee ballot dies before the polls
open on election day, his or her ballot shall be accepted by the county clerk
if the absentee ballot is:
(1) Signed, dated, postmarked, and mailed before the date of
death;
02/18/2025 8:09:36 AM SSS155

SB247
(2) Signed, dated, and delivered to the county clerk by a
designated bearer, authorized agent, or administrator before the date of
death; or
(3) The ballot of a member of the armed services or Arkansas
National Guard in active duty or state active duty executed before the date
of death.
(d) It is the intent of this section to require the election officials
for absentee ballots to meet and process, canvass, and count absentee ballots
according to this section prior to the closing of the polls on election day.
(e)(1)(d)(1) Absentee votes shall be cast on paper ballots.
(2)(A) The ballots shall first be counted for write-in votes by
the election officials.
(B) Then, at the discretion of the county board of
election commissioners, the ballots may be either hand counted or counted on
an electronic vote tabulating device.
(f)(1)(e)(1) Absentee ballots marked as “special runoff ballots”
received from a qualified voter from one (1) of the categories in § 7-5-
406(a) shall be opened for general primary elections and general runoff
elections according to the procedures described in subsection (b) of this
section.
(2) However, in counting the special runoff ballot, one (1) of
the election officials shall open the envelope containing the special runoff
ballot and read the numbers indicated next to the names of the two (2)
candidates in the general primary election or in the general runoff election.
(3) The candidate with the highest ranking shall receive the
vote.
(4) A special runoff ballot received with the preferential
primary absentee ballot shall be counted in the general primary election, and
a special runoff ballot received with the general election absentee ballot
shall be counted in the general runoff election.
(5) The Secretary of State shall prepare instructions for
opening, counting, and canvassing special runoff ballots and provide the
instructions to each county board of election commissioners.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 7, Chapter 5, Subchapter 4, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
02/18/2025 8:09:36 AM SSS155

SB247
7-5-420. State Board of Election Commissioners – Rules.
(a) The State Board of Election Commissioners shall adopt rules that:
(1) Set procedures for the maintenance and storage of absentee
ballot materials and absentee ballots;
(2) Set uniform methods for labeling ballot storage containers
that, at a minimum, document the:
(A) Chain of custody concerning the opening and closing of
the sealed boxes; and
(B) Contents of the boxes in a readily identifiable
manner;
(3) Set standards for the processes, software, and methods used
to list and describe the contents of the ballots, including without
limitation the appropriate use of spreadsheets and summaries;
(4) Prescribe forms for the lists that are required to be
generated and maintained under § 7-5-416;
(5) Set the procedure for the handling of absentee ballots and
voter materials such that the absentee ballots and voter materials are
secured in such a manner that the boxes cannot be opened and the ballots
cannot be handled, viewed, or tampered with except by an authorized election
officials; and
(6) Set the procedures for timely compliance with the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., that ensure the secrecy and
integrity of the voter materials.
(b) The rules shall be promulgated under the Arkansas Administrative
Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. Rules.
(a) When adopting the initial rules required under this act, the State
Board of Election Commissioners shall file the final rules with the Secretary
of State for adoption under § 25-15-204(f):
(1) On or before January 1, 2026; or
(2) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1,
2026, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(b) The board shall file the proposed rules with the Legislative
Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1, 2026, so
that the Legislative Council may consider the rules for approval before
02/18/2025 8:09:36 AM SSS155

SB247
January 1, 2026.



































02/18/2025 8:09:36 AM SSS155